Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4111
Contracts with preferred providers; procedure; discrimination prohibited.

(1) Insurers and participants may contract for health services with preferred providers through a process of competitive bidding or through individual negotiations with preferred providers. After completion of such bidding process or individual negotiations, an insurer or participant may offer to providers the terms and conditions of a preferred provider contract. Providers willing and qualified to meet the terms and conditions of a preferred provider contract offered by an insurer or participant may agree to provide health services pursuant to such contract.

(2) The terms and conditions of the policies or contracts specified in section 44-4109 shall not discriminate against or among health providers. Differences in prices among providers based on individual negotiations with such providers, market conditions, patient mix, method of payment, or price differences among providers in different geographical areas shall not be deemed discrimination.

Laws 1984, LB 902, § 11.